Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 1. Refunding

Cross references. —

As to state refunding bonds, see §

9-4-901

et seq.

Refunding authorized for public purpose. —

The refunding authorized by this article is for a public purpose, as required by art. 13, § 3, Wyo. Const.Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

And complies with municipal debt limitation. —

The refunding authorized by this article complies with the municipal debt limitation provisions of art. 16, § 5, Wyo. Const.Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

64 Am. Jur. 2d Public Securities and Obligations §§ 222 to 228.

Judicial review of securities and exchange commission orders and rules under § 25 of Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USC § 78y), 113 ALR Fed 123.

81A C.J.S. States §§ 255 to 262.

§ 16-5-101.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “General Obligation Public Securities Refunding Law”.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1301; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-5-102(a)(ix).

§ 16-5-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Clerk” means the clerk, secretary or other principal clerical officer of the issuer;

“Federal securities” means the bills, certificates of indebtedness, notes, bonds, or similar obligations which are direct obligations of, or the principal and interest of which obligations are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America;

“Governing body” means the city council, town council, commission, board of commissioners, board of trustees, board of directors or other body in which the legislative powers of the issuer are vested;

“Issuer” means the public body issuing any refunding public security pursuant to this act;

“Ordinance” means an ordinance, resolution or other proceeding by which a governing body takes formal action and adopts legislative provisions and matters of some permanency;

“Public body” means any county, city, town, school district or special district created under the laws of this state or any other local government entity;

“Public security” means a bond, note, certificate of indebtedness, warrant or other obligation for the payment of money, issued by any public body of this state, or any predecessor of any public body, which is payable, or which may be paid, from ad valorem taxes, or which constitutes a debt or an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation and bonds issued to pay for improvements in a local improvement district and payable from special assessments under W.S.

15-6-431

through

15-6-447

, but excluding any warrant or similar obligation payable within one (1) year from the date of its issuance or any obligation solely payable from a pledge of designated revenues other than ad valorem taxes;

“Refunding public security” means a public security which is authorized to be issued pursuant to this act;

“This act” means W.S.

16-5-101

through

16-5-119

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.2; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1302; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 168, § 1; 1987, ch. 151, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 16-5-103.
Authority to refund; purposes therefor.

Any public security or securities issued by any public body of the state may be refunded, without an election, by the public body which issued them, or any successor thereof, in the name of the public body which issued the public securities being refunded, but subject to provisions concerning their payment and to any other contractual limitations in the proceedings authorizing their issuance or otherwise appertaining thereto, for any one (1) or more of the following purposes:

For extending the maturities of all or any part of outstanding public securities for which payment is in arrears, or for which there is not, or it is certain there will not be, sufficient money to pay the principal or interest on outstanding public securities as the same respectively become due;

For reducing interest costs or effecting other economies;

For reorganizing all or any part of the outstanding public securities of a public body in order to equalize tax levies.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.3; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1303; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Governmental unit's power to issue bonds as implying power to refund them, 1 ALR2d 134.

§ 16-5-104.
Interest; terms and conditions; negotiability.

Refunding public securities shall bear interest, payable semiannually or annually, and evidenced by one (1) or two (2) sets of coupons, if any, except that the first coupon or coupons appertaining to a refunding public security may evidence interest for a period not in excess of one (1) year, and refunding public securities may be in one (1) or more series, may bear a date or dates, may mature in an amount or amounts, serially or otherwise, at a time or times not exceeding thirty (30) years from their respective dates, may be in a denomination or denominations, may be payable in a medium of payment, in a place or places within or without the state, including but not limited to the office of the county treasurer of a county in which the issuer is located wholly or in part, may carry registration privileges, may be subject to terms of prior redemption in advance of maturity in order, or by lot, or otherwise, at a time or times with or without premium, may bear privileges for reissuance in the same or other denominations, may be so reissued (without modification of maturities and interest rates) and may be in a form, either coupon or registered, as may be provided by ordinance of the governing body. Except as the governing body may otherwise provide, the refunding public securities and attached interest coupons shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code — Investment Securities [§§ 34.1-8-101 through 34.1-8-603]. Except as otherwise provided each holder of a refunding public security, by accepting the security, shall be conclusively deemed to have agreed that the refunding public security is and shall be fully negotiable within the meaning and for all purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code — Investment Securities.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.4; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1304; Laws 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1; ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-5-105.
General prerequisites and limitations.

No public securities may be refunded hereunder unless the holders voluntarily surrender them for exchange or payment, or unless they either mature or are callable for prior redemption under their terms within twenty-five (25) years from the date of issuance of the refunding public securities. Provision shall be made for paying the public securities being refunded within the stated period of time. No maturity of public security being refunded may be extended over twenty-five (25) years. No public security may be refunded hereunder unless the public security has been outstanding for at least one (1) year since the date of its delivery. The principal amount of the refunding public securities may not exceed the original authorized principal amount of the public securities being refunded. The principal amount of the refunding public securities may be less than or the same as the principal amount of the public securities being refunded so long as provision is duly and sufficiently made for the payment of the public securities being refunded.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.5; Laws 1969, ch. 71, § 1; 1971, ch. 254, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1305; Laws 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1; ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 151, § 1.

Applied

in

Rodin v. State ex rel. City of Cheyenne, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

§ 16-5-106.
Limitations on number of issues.

A public body may issue refunding public securities to refund one (1) or more or any part of one (1) or more or all issues of its public securities which are outstanding, and refunding public securities and public securities authorized for any other purposes may be issued separately or issued in combination in one (1) series or more by any issuer except as hereafter provided. No two (2) or more issues or parts of issues of outstanding public securities shall be refunded by a single issue of refunding public securities unless the taxable property upon which tax levies are being made for payment of the outstanding public securities is identical to the taxable property on which the levies are being made for the payment of all other outstanding public securities proposed to be refunded by the single issue of refunding public securities. No two (2) or more issues or parts of issues of outstanding public securities or refunding public securities and public securities authorized for any other purposes shall be combined in one (1) issue where more than one (1) constitutional or statutory debt limitation is applicable to the combination.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.6; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1306; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-5-107.
Maximum allowable indebtedness.

In no event shall the aggregate amount of indebtedness of any issuer exceed the maximum allowable amount as determined pursuant to the constitutional and statutory provisions, if any, applicable to the issuer. In determining and computing the aggregate amount of indebtedness of any issuer, public securities which have been refunded, as provided in this act, by immediate payment or prior redemption and retirement or by the placement of the proceeds of refunding public securities or investments thereof in escrow, shall not be deemed outstanding indebtedness from and after the date on which sufficient monies are placed with the paying agent of the outstanding public securities for the purpose of immediately paying, or redeeming and retiring the bonds, or from and after the date on which the proceeds of the refunding public securities or investments thereof are placed in escrow.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.7; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1307; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence, see § 16-5-102(a)(ix).

§ 16-5-108.
Sale or exchange; price.

Any refunding public securities may be delivered in exchange for the outstanding public securities being refunded or may be publicly or privately sold in the manner determined by the governing body. Refunding public securities may be publicly or privately sold at, above, or below the par value thereof.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.8; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1308; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 151, § 1.

§ 16-5-109.
Costs of refunding.

The incidental costs of the refunding of public securities may be paid by the purchaser of the refunding public securities or defrayed from the general fund of the public body or from the proceeds of the refunding public securities or from the interest or other yield derived from the investment of the proceeds or from other sources legally available therefor.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.9; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1309; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Applied

in

Rodin v. State ex rel. City of Cheyenne, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

§ 16-5-110.
Disposition of proceeds; escrowed proceeds.

The proceeds of refunding public securities shall either be immediately applied to the retirement of the public securities to be refunded or be placed in escrow in any state or national bank within the state which is a member of the federal deposit insurance corporation and which has trust powers, to be applied to the payment of the public securities being refunded upon their presentation. Any accrued interest and any premium appertaining to a sale of refunding public securities may be applied to the payment of the principal and interest, or both may be deposited in a reserve account, or may be used to defray incidental costs, as the governing body may determine. Any escrow shall not be limited to proceeds of refunding public securities, but may include other monies available for its purpose. Any escrowed proceeds, may be invested or reinvested in federal securities. Escrowed proceeds and investments, together with any interest or other yield to be derived from any investment, shall be in an amount at all times sufficient to cover principal, interest, any prior redemption premium due, and any charges of the escrow agent, to pay the public securities being refunded as they become due at their respective maturities or due at designated prior redemption dates in connection with which the governing body of the issuer shall exercise a prior redemption option. The computations made in determining sufficiency shall be verified by a certified public accountant certificated to practice in this state or in any other state. Any purchaser of any refunding public security is not responsible for the application of the proceeds thereof by the issuer or any of its officers, agents or employees.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.10; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1310; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2005, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “certificated” for “licensed” in the next to last sentence.

Municipal functions not unconstitutionally delegated. —

The provisions of this section, prescribing the powers and duties of the escrow bank with respect to escrowed municipal funds, do not constitute a delegation of power to a private corporation to supervise public moneys, properties or effects, or otherwise perform municipal functions, in contravention of art. 3, § 37, Wyo. Const.Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

Debt in excess of taxes for current year not created. —

See Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

§ 16-5-111.
Signing, countersigning, execution or attestation of securities or interest coupons; facsimile seals and signatures.

Any refunding public security or interest coupon may be signed, countersigned, executed or attested by the public officials who are authorized by law at the time of the issuance of the refunding public securities to sign, countersign, execute or attest public securities of the issuer of the same general character as those public securities and coupons which are being refunded. In the alternative, the governing body may, in its discretion, designate appropriate public officials to sign, countersign, execute or attest any refunding public security or appurtenant coupon. Any officer so authorized may utilize a facsimile signature in lieu of his manual signature in the manner provided by law, provided that compliance with any law other than this act is not a condition of execution with a facsimile signature of any interest coupon. The clerk may cause the seal or a facsimile of the seal of the issuer to be printed, stamped or otherwise placed on any refunding public security. The facsimile seal shall have the same legal effect as the impression of the seal. Refunding public securities and any coupons bearing the signatures of officers in office on the date of the signing shall be valid and binding obligations of the issuer, notwithstanding that before the delivery and payment any or all persons whose signatures appear have ceased to fill their respective offices. Any officer authorized to sign, countersign, execute or attest any refunding public security or interest coupon, at the time of its execution or of the execution of a signature certificate, may adopt for his facsimile signature the facsimile signature of his predecessor in office in the event the facsimile signature appears upon the refunding public security or coupons, or upon both the public security and coupons.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.11; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1311; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the third sentence, see § 16-5-102(a)(ix).

§ 16-5-112.
Recitals in securities imparting legality.

Any ordinance authorizing, or any other instrument appertaining to, any refunding public securities may provide that each refunding public security authorized shall recite that it is issued under the authority of this act [§§

16-5-101

through

16-5-119

]. The recital shall conclusively impart full compliance with all of the provisions and all public securities issued containing the recital are incontestable for any cause whatsoever after their delivery for value.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.12; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1312; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 16-5-102(a)(ix).

§ 16-5-113.
Endorsement.

The clerk shall endorse a certificate upon every refunding public security that it is issued pursuant to law and is within the debt limit of the issuer.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.13; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1313; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-5-114.
Governing body's determination of legality.

The determination of a governing body that all the limitations hereunder imposed upon the issuance of refunding public securities have been met is conclusive in the absence of fraud or arbitrary and gross abuse of discretion.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.14; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1314; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-5-115.
Refunding by divided governing bodies.

When a public body having outstanding indebtedness has been divided and parts thereof included within two (2) or more other public bodies, by any lawful means, the refunding of the securities requires affirmative action by a majority of the members of the governing bodies of each of the public bodies within which any part of the area of the public body which is being lawfully taxed to pay the outstanding indebtedness is then included except as hereinafter provided. The indebtedness of any public body outstanding at the time a part or parts of the public body are detached therefrom by any lawful means, and which public body has retained its lawful corporate existence subsequent to the detachment of the land from the public body may be refunded by action of the governing body of the public body from which land has been detached with or without concurrence or action by the governing board of the public body, if any, within which the detached land is included.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.15; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1315; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-5-116.
Financing; annual property tax; other funds.

The governing body shall cause to be levied annually, without limitation of rate or amount, upon all taxable property of the issuer, in addition to other authorized taxes, a sufficient sum to pay the principal of and interest on the refunding public securities until the refunding public securities issued pursuant to this act are fully paid. The governing body may apply any other funds that are in the treasury of the issuer and available for payment of the interest or principal as it respectively matures, and the levy or levies provided for may be diminished. Should the tax for the payment of the principal and interest on any refunding public security at any time not be levied or collected in time to meet the payment, or if the refunding public securities are issued at a time which makes it impossible to levy a tax for the initial installments of principal or interest, the principal or interest so maturing shall be paid out of the general fund of the issuer, or from any other funds available for that purpose. For the purpose of reimbursing the fund or funds the money so used may be repaid from the first monies collected from taxes thereafter levied. The full faith and credit of the issuer shall be pledged for the punctual payment of the principal and interest on the refunding public securities. If the public securities to be refunded and the interest accruing would have been paid from taxes levied upon only part of the taxable property within the boundaries of the issuer, the taxes levied for payment or redemption of the refunding public securities, and the interest accruing shall be levied in the same manner and upon only the same taxable property as would have been levied for the payment of the public securities to be refunded if no refunding of the public securities had been accomplished. Any tax levied to retire any refunding public security issued by a hospital district is subject to the limitations set forth in W.S.

35-2-414

, provided any refunding securities issued under this act to refund local improvement bonds shall be payable solely from and secured by the pledge of special assessments under W.S.

15-6-401

through

15-6-448

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.16; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1316; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 168, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first and last sentences, see § 16-5-102(a)(ix).

§ 16-5-117.
Exemption from taxation; exception.

The refunding public securities issued by any issuer pursuant to this act, their transfer, and the income therefrom, shall at all times be free from taxation within the state of Wyoming, except for estate taxes.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.18; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1318; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; ch. 74, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-5-102(a)(ix).

§ 16-5-118.
Other outstanding securities.

This act shall have no effect on the legality of any outstanding public security issued for refunding or other purposes pursuant to any other law.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.19; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1319; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-5-102(a)(ix).

§ 16-5-119.
Scope, authority and effect of provisions.

This act, without reference to other statutes of the state, except as herein otherwise specifically provided, is full authority for the authorization and issuance of refunding public securities. No other act or law with regard to the authorization or issuance of securities that in any way impedes or restricts the carrying out of the acts herein authorized shall be construed as applying to any proceedings taken or acts pursuant hereto except as otherwise provided. The powers conferred and the limitations imposed by this act are in addition and supplemental to, and not in substitution for, and shall not affect the powers conferred by any other law except as otherwise provided herein.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 91, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 9-623.20; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1320; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first and last sentences, see § 16-5-102(a)(ix).